Utah statutes.
53B-14-101.   Student loan delinquent or in default -- Authority to collect.
If a National Direct Student Loan or a student loan made under Title 53B,
Chapter 11 or 12, is delinquent or in default, the state college, university,
or board of regents responsible for collection of the loan may proceed under
this chapter to collect the loan.
